Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2147.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 32-9,100 is hereby revived and amended to read as
follows: 32-9,100. On and after January 1, 2013 July 1, 2020, the Kansas
department of wildlife, and parks and tourism shall offer a resident senior
combination hunting and fishing pass to residents of this state who are 65
years of age or more. The fee for such pass shall be an amount not to
exceed 1/ the fee for a general combination lifetime hunting and fishing

license. The provisions of this section shall expire on June 30, 2020 what
is required for such pass to qualify as a paid hunting license pursuant to
16 U.S.C. § 669 et seq., or a paid fishing license pursuant to 16 U.S.C. §
777 et seq.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 32-9,101 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 32-9,101. (a) (1) The secretary of wildlife and parks shall issue
and make available a Kansas kids lifetime combination hunting and
fishing license to any child who is a resident, as defined in K.S.A. 32-701,
and amendments thereto, and:
(A) Five years of age or younger, upon payment of a license fee that
shall not exceed $300; or
(B) six or seven years of age, upon payment of a license fee that shall
not exceed $500.
(2) The fee for such license shall be an amount not to exceed what is
required for such pass to qualify as a paid hunting license pursuant to 16
U.S.C. § 669 et seq., or a paid fishing license pursuant to 16 U.S.C. § 777

HB 2147 2
et seq.
(3) Such license fee may be paid on behalf of such child.
(b) The secretary of wildlife and parks shall report annually to the
house of representatives agriculture and natural resources budget
committee and the senate committee on agriculture and natural resources,
or the successor of such committees, on the number of such Kansas kids
lifetime combination hunting and fishing licenses issued by the Kansas
department of wildlife and parks.
(c) The provisions of this section shall expire on July 1, 2032.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 32-9,100, as revived and amended by section 1 of this
act, K.S.A. 32-9,100, as amended by section 64 of chapter 7 of the 2023
Session Laws of Kansas, and K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 32-9,101 are hereby
repealed.
Sec. 4. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.